Oklahoma, session 2026, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 416 of Title 3, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics, to be


designated the “Oklahoma Southeastern Regional Airport Improvement


Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject


to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received


by the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics from


appropriations of the Legislature designated for deposit in this


fund. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby

Req. No. 925 Page 1


appropriated and shall be budgeted and expended to provide funding


for repairs, planning, staging, refurbishments, improvements to real


and personal property, and for an air traffic control tower at any


regional airport that is east of United States Highway 69, south of


United States Highway 70, and within an Oklahoma municipality with a


population of no more than twenty thousand (20,000) persons and no


less than ten thousand (10,000) persons as determined by the latest


Federal Decennial Census. No expenditures shall be made from the


fund until the State Treasurer determines that funds provided by


local and county governments, tribal governments, the federal


government, real and personal property donation, or through monetary


donations in the amount of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) are


made for repairs, planning, staging, refurbishments, and


improvements to real and personal property, and for an air traffic


control tower at any regional airport that is east of United States


Highway 69, south of United States Highway 70, and within an


Oklahoma municipality with a population of no more than twenty


thousand (20,000) persons and no less than ten thousand (10,000)


persons as determined by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


provided, no funds collected or received prior to the effective date


of this act shall be counted toward the amount. Expenditures from


the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and

Req. No. 925 Page 2


payment. On July 1, 2027, if no determination is made by the State


Treasurer pursuant to the provisions of this section authorizing


expenditures from this fund, all unencumbered funds remaining in the


Oklahoma Southeastern Regional Airport Improvement Revolving Fund


shall be transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Southeastern Regional Airport Improvement Revolving Fund from any


monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of


the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the sum


of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-925 CJD 1/19/2025 5:40:53 AM











Req. No. 925 Page 3